Nebraska, session 109, LB612.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB612 LB612
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 24-514, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
24-514 (1) The State of Nebraska shall pay, with funds appropriated
to the Supreme Court, all salaries, benefits, and expenses related to the
education and travel of judges and employees of the county courts. The
state shall also pay, with funds appropriated to the Supreme Court, fifty
percent of the following operational costs of the county courts. :
(1) Computer hardware and software used for data processing;
(2) Computer hardware and software used for word processing if the
costs are incurred on equipment owned by the state;
(3) Communication line costs arising from data and word processing
pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section; and
(4) Multi-track recorders, microphones, and playback units used to
create verbatim records of county court proceedings.
(2) The county shall pay any county court expense not provided for
in this section. All property purchased by the county as a county court
expense before September 9, 1993, or on or after September 9, 1993, shall
remain the property of the county.
Sec. 2. Original section 24-514, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-